en: Frozen red cabbage
de: Gefrorene Rotkohle, Gefrorener Rotkohl
es: Lombardas congeladas, Lombarda congelada, Col lombarda congelada
fr: Choux rouges surgelés
hr: Smrznuti crveni kupus
nl: Diepvries rode kolen

en: Frozen green cabbage
fr: Choux verts surgelés

en: Frozen romanesco, Frozen romanesco broccoli, Frozen romanesque cauliflower
es: Romanesco congelado, Romanescu congelado
fr: Chou romanesco surgelé
hr: Smrznuti romanesco
nl: Diepvries Romanescos

en: Frozen zucchini, Frozen courgettes
de: Gefrorene Zucchini
es: Calabacines congelados
fr: Courgettes surgelées
hr: Smrznute tikvice
nl: Diepvriescourgettes

en: Frozen diced zucchinis, Frozen diced courgettes
de: Gefrorene gehackte Zucchini
es: Calabacines en dados congelados
fr: Courgettes en cubes surgelées
hr: Smrznute tikvice narezane na kockice
nl: Diepvriescourgettes in blokjes

en: Frozen sliced zucchini, Frozen sliced courgettes
de: Gefrohrene geschnittene Zucchini
es: Calabacines en rodajas congelados
fr: Courgettes en rondelles surgelées
hr: Smrznute narezane tikvice
nl: Diepvriescourgettes in schijfjes

en: Frozen legumes
de: Gefrorene Hülsenfrüchte
es: Leguminosas congeladas, Legumbres congeladas
fi: pakastetut palkokasvit
fr: Légumineuses surgelées, légumineuses surgelés
hr: Smrznute mahunarke
it: Legumi surgelati, Legumi congelati
nl: Diepvriespeulvruchten
pl: Rośliny strączkowe głęboko mrożone

en: Frozen lima beans
de: Gefrohrene Limabohne
es: Garrofones congelados, Garrofón congelado, Habones congelados, Judías de Lima congeladas, Habas de Lima congeladas
fr: Haricots de Lima surgelés
hr: Smrznuti lima grah
nl: Diepvrieslimabonen

en: Canned butter beans, Canned yellow beans
fr: Haricots beurre en conserve, Haricots beurre appertisés
hr: Konzervirani maslac grah
pt: Feijões amanteigados em lata

en: Frozen butter beans
fr: Haricots beurre surgelés
hr: Smrznuti grah s maslacem
nl: Diepvries limabonen

en: Frozen chickpeas, Frozen garbanzo beans
bg: Замразен нахут
da: Frosne kikærter
de: Gefrohrene Kichererbsen
es: Garbanzos congelados
fr: Pois chiches surgelés
hr: Smrznuti slanutak
nl: Diepvrieskikkererwten

en: Frozen common beans
de: Gefrorene Gartenbohnen, Gefrorene Fisolen, Gefrorene Strankerl, Gefrorene Stangenbohnen
es: Alubias congeladas, Judías congeladas, Frijoles congelados, Porotos congelados
fr: Haricots surgelés
hr: Smrznuti obični grah
nl: Diepvries gewone boon

en: Frozen nuts
bg: Замразени ядки
de: Gefröhrene Nüsse
es: Frutos de cáscara congelados, Frutos secos congelados
fr: Fruits à coques surgelés
hr: Smrznuti orasi
nl: Diepvriesnoten

en: Frozen chestnuts
de: Gefröhrene Kastanien
es: Castañas congeladas
fr: Châtaignes surgelées, Châtaignes surgelés
hr: Smrznuti kesteni
nl: Diepvrieskastanjes

en: Dried plant-based foods
bg: Сушени растителни храни
ca: Aliments secs amb base vegetal
de: Getrocknete Produkte auf pflanzlicher Basis
es: Alimentos de origen vegetal deshidratados, Alimentos de origen vegetal secos, Alimentos de origen vegetal desecados, Vegetales deshidratados, Vegetales desecados
fi: kuivatut kasvipohjaiset tuotteet
fr: Aliments à base de plantes séchées, Aliments secs à base de plantes
he: מזון מיובש מן הצומח
hr: Sušena hrana biljnog podrijetla
hu: Szárított növényi alapú ételek
it: Cibi disidratati a base di vegetali
nl: Producten op basis van gedroogde planten
pl: Suszone produkty pochodzenia roślinnego
pt: Alimentos à base de plantas secos
ru: Сушеные блюда из растений
sv: Torkad växtbaserad mat
zh: 干燥植物性食品

en: Canned plant-based foods
bg: Консервирани растителни храни
ca: Aliments enllaunats amb base vegetal
de: Konserven-Produkte auf pflanzlicher Basis
es: Alimentos de origen vegetal en conserva, Conservas de origen vegetal, Vegetales en conserva
fi: Purkitetut kasvipohjaiset ruoat
fr: Aliments à base de plantes en conserve
hr: Konzervirana hrana biljnog podrijetla
hu: Növényialapú élelmiszerek konzervben
it: Cibi in scatola di origine vegetale
nl: Conserven Producten in blik/pot
pl: Konserwy roślinne w puszkach i słoikach
pt: Alimentos à base de plantas enlatados
ru: Консервы из растительных продуктов
tr: Konserve bitkisel gıdalar, Konserve bitkisel yiyecekler, Konserve bitki kaynaklı gıdalar, Konserve bitki kaynaklı yiyecekler, Bitkisel konserve gıdalar, Bitkisel konserve yiyecekler, Bitki kaynaklı konserve gıdalar, Bitki kaynaklı konserve yiyecekler
zh: 罐装植物性食品

en: Fresh plant-based foods
ca: Aliments vegetals frescs
da: Friske plantebaserede fødevarer
de: Frische pflanzliche Lebensmittel
es: Alimentos de origen vegetal frescos, Vegetales frescos
fi: Tuoreet kasvipohjaiset ruoat
fr: Aliments à base de plantes frais
he: מזון טרי מן הצומח
hr: Svježe biljne namirnice
hu: Friss növényi alapú ételek
it: Cibi freschi a base vegetale
nl: Producten op basis van verse planten
ro: Alimente proaspete pe bază de plante
sv: Färsk växtbaserad mat
zh: 新鲜蔬菜食品

en: Hearts of palm, Heart of palm
ar: جمار
de: Palmherzen
eo: Palmomedolo
es: Palmitos, Palmito
fa: پنیر نخل
fr: Cœurs de palmier, cœurs de palmiers, cœur de palmier, coeur de palmier, coeurs de palmiers, coeurs de palmier, choux palmistes, chou palmiste
gl: Palmito
gv: Cabbash phalm
he: לבבות דקל
hr: Srca dlana
it: cuori di palma, Palmito
ja: ハート・オブ・パーム
jv: Pondhoh
la: Cerebrum palmae
lt: Palmės šerdis
nl: Palmharten
pl: Serce palmy
pt: Palmito
ru: Сердцевина пальмы
sv: Palmhjärta
tl: Ubod

en: Canned palm hearts, Canned palm heart, Canned hearts of palm
de: Palmherzen in der Dose
es: Palmitos en conserva, Palmito en conserva
fr: Cœurs de palmier en conserve, Coeur de palmier appertisé
hr: Konzervirano srce palme
it: Cuori di palma in scatola
nl: Palmharten in blik/pot

en: Appetizers, Starters
bg: Предястия
ca: Aperitius
da: Forretter
de: Vorspeisen, Aperitifs, Häppchen
es: Aperitivos, Entrantes
fi: alkupalat
fr: Amuse-gueules, Entrées, Entrée
he: מתאבנים
hr: Predjela
hu: Előételek
it: Antipasti
ja: 前菜
nl: Voorgerechten, Voorgerecht
pl: Przystawki
pt: Aperitivos
ro: Aperitive
ru: Аппетайзеры, предястия
sv: Aptitretare
th: อาหารเรียกน้ำย่อย
zh: 开胃菜